Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 16 Attendance of Witnesses from Without State

12-16-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Without the State in Criminal Cases.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-1

.

12-16-2.
Definitions.

“State” includes any territory of the United States and the District of Columbia.

“Witness” as used in this chapter includes a person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution, or proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-2

.

12-16-3.
Certification by foreign judge as to witness from this state.

If a judge of a court of record in any state, which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within that state to attend and testify in this state, certifies under the seal of the court: (1) that there is a criminal prosecution pending in the court or that a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence, (2) that a person being within this state is a material witness in the prosecution or grand jury investigation, and (3) that the person’s presence will be required for a specified number of days, upon presentation of the certificate to any judge of a court of record in the county in which the person is, the judge shall fix a time and place for a hearing, and shall make an order directing the witness to appear at a certain time and place for the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-3

.

12-16-4.
Issuance of summons to appear in another state.

If at a hearing the judge determines: (1) that the witness is material and necessary, (2) that it will not cause undue hardship to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the prosecution or a grand jury investigation in the other state, and (3) that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is pending or grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence will give to him or her protection from arrest and the service of civil and criminal process, the judge shall issue a summons with a copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is pending or where a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence at a time and place specified in the summons. In any hearing the certificate shall be prima facie evidence of all the facts stated in it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-4

.

12-16-5.
Taking into custody and delivery of witness.

If the certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state to assure his or her attendance in the requesting state, the judge may, in lieu of notification of the hearing, direct that the witness be immediately brought before him or her for the hearing; and the judge at the hearing, being satisfied of the desirability of custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof of that desirability, may, in lieu of issuing subpoena or summons, order that the witness be immediately taken into custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-5

.

12-16-6.
Punishment for disobedience of summons.

If a witness, who is summoned as provided in this chapter, after being paid or tendered by some properly authorized person the sum of ten cents ($0.10) a mile for each mile and five dollars ($5.00) for each day that he or she is required to travel and attend as a witness, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, he or she shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-6

.

12-16-7.
Certificate to summon witness from another state.

If a person in any state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within its borders to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions or grand jury investigations commenced or about to commence in this state is a material witness in a prosecution pending in a court of record in this state or in a grand jury investigation which has commenced or is about to commence, a judge of the court may issue a certificate under the seal of the court stating these facts and specifying the number of days the witness will be required. This certificate shall be presented to a judge of a court of record in the county in which the witness is found.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-7

.

12-16-8.
Receiving custody of witness from another state.

If the certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of this state to assure his or her attendance in this state, the judge may direct that the witness be immediately brought before him or her; and the judge, being satisfied of the desirability of the custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof, may order that the witness be immediately taken into custody and delivered to an officer of this state, which order shall be sufficient authority to the officer to take the witness into custody and hold him or her unless and until he or she may be released by bail, recognizance, or order of the judge issuing the certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-8

.

12-16-9.
Fees tendered — Duration of attendance required — Failure to testify.

If the witness is summoned to attend and testify in this state, he or she shall be tendered the sum of ten cents ($0.10) a mile for each mile and five dollars ($5.00) for each day that he or she is required to travel and attend as a witness. A witness who has appeared in accordance with the provisions of the summons shall not be required to remain within this state for a longer period of time than the period mentioned in the certificate, unless otherwise ordered by the court. If the witness fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, he or she shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-9

.

12-16-10.
Exemption from process of witnesses entering state.

If a person comes into this state in obedience to a summons directing him or her to attend and testify in this state that person shall not, while in this state pursuant to the summons or order, be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his or her entrance into this state under the summons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-10

.

12-16-11.
Exemption from process of witnesses passing through state.

A person passing through this state while going to another state in obedience to a summons or order to attend and testify in that state or while returning from testifying, shall not, while so passing through this state, be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his or her entrance into this state under the summons or order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-11

.

12-16-12.
Uniformity of construction.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of the states which enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-12

.

12-16-13.
Severability.

If any part of this chapter is for any reason declared void, its invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2382, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 626, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-16-13

.